Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5901YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2272 Section 1. Section 256.146, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) Establish issuance and renewal requirements, provided 3 that a continuing education requirement may be completed by 4 electronic means, and there shall be no renewal requirement for 5 a practitioner any of the following practitioners: 6 (a) A practitioner who has been employed as a practitioner 7 for at least ten years and who possesses a masterâs or doctoral 8 degree, unless the practitioner holds an evaluator approval 9 endorsement, which must be renewed at least once every ten 10 years. 11 (b) A practitioner who has been employed as a practitioner 12 for at least twenty years, unless the practitioner holds an 13 evaluator approval endorsement, which must be renewed at least 14 once every ten years. 15